Hawaii statutes.
[§291D-3.5] U-drive vehicles; traffic
infractions. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except those
pertaining to the care and maintenance of the vehicle, if the registered owner
of record is the lessor of a rental or U-drive motor vehicle, as defined in
section 286-2, pursuant to a written lease agreement, the lessee at the time of
the issuance of the traffic infraction shall be responsible for such summons or
citation; provided that the lessor shall be responsible for such summons or
citation if the lessor does not provide the court having jurisdiction over the
summons or citation the name and address of the lessee within forty-five days
after a notice containing the date, time, and location of the violation and the
license number of the vehicle; provided further that if requested by the lessor
in writing within forty-five days of such notice of violation other than for
parking citations, the administrative judge of the court having jurisdiction
over the citation or summons shall waive the requirement of providing the name
and address of the lessee by the lessor and impose an administrative fee of $5
per citation on the lessor, plus costs and fees not to exceed $10 in total per
violation, notwithstanding section 607-4 or other sections of the law, county
ordinance, or any rule to the contrary. In the case of parking citations, the
administrative judge of the court having jurisdiction over the citation or
summons may waive the requirement of providing the name and address of the
lessee by the lessor and impose an administrative fee of $5 per parking
citation on the lessor, plus costs and fees not to exceed $10 in total per such
violation, notwithstanding section 607-4 or other sections of the law, county
ordinance, or any rule to the contrary. [L 2007, c 85, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next